Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.065

Exemption—Temporary growing structures used for production of horticultural plants.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to temporary growing structures used solely for the production of horticultural plants including ornamental plants, flowers, vegetables, and fruits. A temporary growing structure is not considered a building or structure for purposes of this chapter.

[ 2024 c 19 s 3; 1996 c 157 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2024 c 19: "The legislature recognizes that both food security and food quality are increasingly threatened by ongoing logistical supply line disruptions and inflation. Access to and affordability of food, in particular fresh fruits and vegetables, is vital to the health and well-being of our citizens. The legislature finds that supporting the growth and development of innovative new low-energy techniques for the year-round production of fresh fruits and vegetables at the local level is a crucial part of solving this need. Local food banks have done tremendous work in providing access to nutrition during the COVID-19 pandemic. The legislature finds that supporting local food banks in providing access to affordable nutrition enhances the health and welfare of our citizens. The legislature seeks to encourage the adoption of these techniques by individual families in order to increase and enhance access and availability to fresh year-round food supplies for themselves and their communities." [ 2024 c 19 s 1.]

Effective date—1996 c 157: See note following RCW 19.27.015.